Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2520
Funds received; use; restriction; exception.

(1) All money derived from fees, excises, or license fees relating to registration, operation, or use of vehicles on the public highways, or to fuels used for the propulsion of such vehicles, shall be expended for payment of highway obligations, cost of construction, reconstruction, maintenance, and repair of public highways and bridges and county, city, township, and village roads, streets, and bridges, and all facilities, appurtenances, and structures deemed necessary in connection with such highways, bridges, roads, and streets, or may be pledged to secure bonded indebtedness issued for such purposes, except for (a) the cost of administering laws under which such money is derived, (b) statutory refunds and adjustments provided therein, and (c) money derived from the motor vehicle operators' license fees or money received from parking meter proceeds, fines, and penalties.

(2)(a) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section also apply to sales and use taxes imposed on motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers pursuant to sections 13-319, 77-27,142, and 77-6403, except that such provisions shall not apply in a municipality that has issued bonds (i) the proceeds of which were used for purposes listed in subsection (1) of this section and for which revenue other than sales and use taxes on motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers is pledged for payment or (ii) approved by a vote that required the use of sales and use taxes imposed on motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers for a specific purpose other than those listed in subsection (1) of this section, until all such bonds issued prior to January 1, 2006, have been paid or retired.

(b) The municipality shall determine (i) the amount of revenue other than sales and use tax revenue derived from motor vehicles, trailers, or semitrailers that is to be expended for the purposes listed in subsection (1) of this section and (ii) the amount of sales and use taxes expected to be collected from sales of motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers for that year. The municipality shall create and maintain such determination as a public record and certify the determination pursuant to sections 39-2120 and 39-2121.

Laws 1969, c. 316, § 10, p. 1143;

Laws 1971, LB 74, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 271, § 17;

Laws 2006, LB 904, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB82, § 16;

Laws 2019, LB472, § 9.